src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_bagwaaniigin_gt-norm.yaml
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyiwaang
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyiwaag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsinaaning
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsinaanig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaang
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+4+4: obagwaaniiginoonyiniwa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+4+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyiniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+4+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyiniwa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaang
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+4+4: obagwaaniiginoonsiniwa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+4+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsiniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+4+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsiniwa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaang
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+4: nibagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonyibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+4: nibagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonsibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+4: ibagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoonyibaniing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+4: ibagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoonsibaniing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: nibagwaaniiginomishinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4: obagwaaniiginomishini
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt: nibagwaaniiginomishiban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nibagwaaniiginomishidin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt: gibagwaaniiginomishiban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishidin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt: obagwaaniiginomishiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishidin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt: ibagwaaniiginomishiban
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ibagwaaniiginomishidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+4: nibagwaaniiginomishan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: nibagwaaniiginomishing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: nibagwaaniiginomishan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+4: gibagwaaniiginomishan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomishing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+4: obagwaaniiginomishan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: obagwaaniiginomishing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishan
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+4: ibagwaaniiginomishan
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: ibagwaaniiginomishing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: ibagwaaniiginomishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: nibagwaaniiginominaaniban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nibagwaaniiginominaanidig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: gibagwaaniiginominaaniban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gibagwaaniiginominaanidig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: gibagwaaniiginomiwaaban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomiwaadig
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+4+Prt: obagwaaniiginominiiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl: obagwaaniiginominiidin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: obagwaaniiginomiwaaban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: obagwaaniiginomiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+4: nibagwaaniiginominaanin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginominaaning
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginominaanig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginominaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginominaaning
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginominaanig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginomiwaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomiwaang
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomiwaag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+4+4: obagwaaniiginominiwa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+4+Loc: obagwaaniiginominiing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+4+Pl: obagwaaniiginominiwa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginomiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginomiwaang
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginomiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt+4: nibagwaaniiginomibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginomibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginomibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginomibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginomibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginomibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginomibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt+4: ibagwaaniiginomibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt+Loc: ibagwaaniiginomibaniing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt+Pl: ibagwaaniiginomibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nibagwaaniiginoshinaaniban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoshinaanidig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gibagwaaniiginoshinaaniban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshinaanidig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaaban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaadig
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt: obagwaaniiginoshiniiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: obagwaaniiginoshiniidin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: obagwaaniiginoshiwaaban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: obagwaaniiginoshiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+4: nibagwaaniiginoshinaanin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoshinaaning
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoshinaanig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoshinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoshinaaning
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshinaanig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaang
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+4+4: obagwaaniiginoshiniwa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+4+Loc: obagwaaniiginoshiniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+4+Pl: obagwaaniiginoshiniwa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoshiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoshiwaang
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoshiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+4: nibagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoshibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoshibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoshibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+4: ibagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoshibaniing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+4: nibagwaaniiginonaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginonaanibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginonaanibaniig
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nibagwaaniiginonaanidigan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginonaanidiging
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginonaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginonaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginonaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginonaanibaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginonaanidigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginonaanidiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginonaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginowaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginowaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginowaabaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginowaadigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginowaadiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginowaadigag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+4+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+4+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoniibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+4+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoniidiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginowaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginowaabaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginowaabaniig
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginowaadigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginowaadiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginowaadigag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: bagwaaniiginoonyishibaniin
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniiginoonyishibaniing
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniiginoonyishibaniin
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: bagwaaniiginoonsishibaniin
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniiginoonsishibaniing
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniiginoonsishibaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyimishiwaa
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsimishinaan
